Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 109
TRUST COMPANIES

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2003. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Cross references:

For the "Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act", see article 13 of title 38.

Law reviews:

For article, "Applying the

C

olorado Trust

C

ompany Act to CPAs and Lawyers", see 30 Colo. Law. 59 (May 2001).

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 POWERS

PART 3 CHARTERS

PART 4 RECORDS, REPORTING, AND INFORMATION

PART 5 DIRECTORS

PART 6 OFFENSES, PENALTIES, REMOVAL, SUSPENSION, AND ENFORCEMENT

PART 7 LIQUIDATION, DISSOLUTION, AND EMERGENCY CHARTERS

PART 8 APPEALS

PART 9 TRUST PRACTICES

PART 10 PRIVATE FAMILY TRUST COMPANIES